Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6404
Imposition of sales and use tax; limitation.

A county shall not impose a sales and use tax pursuant to the Qualified Judgment Payment Act if such county is imposing a tax pursuant to section 13-319.

Laws 2019, LB472, § 4.
January 1, 2027